Massachusetts, session 194th, S640.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 140 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
Section 174H the following new section:-
Section 174I.
(a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following meanings unless
the context clearly requires otherwise:
"Alternative test method", a process or procedure implemented to obtain information
regarding the biological effects of exposure to a chemical or agent that does not employ the use
of an animal and results in the gathering of valid information that would otherwise be acquired
of 3

through the use of a traditional animal test method, including, but not limited to, computational
toxicology, bioinformatics, high-throughput screening methods, chemical substances testing,
tiered testing methods, in vitro studies, and systems biology.
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of public health.
"Contract testing facility", a partnership, corporation, association, or other legal
relationship that tests chemicals, ingredients, product formulations, or products.
"Manufacturer", a partnership, corporation, association, or other legal relationship that
produces products, product formulations, chemicals, or ingredients.
"Medical research", investigations, experiments, and studies to discover, develop, or
verify knowledge relating to the causes, diagnosis, treatment, prevention, or control of physical
or mental diseases and impairments of humans and animals or relating to the development of
biomedical products, devices, or pharmaceuticals.
"Traditional animal test method", a process or procedure using animals to obtain
information regarding the biological effects of exposure to a chemical or agent.
(b) (1) When testing a product, product formulation, chemical, or ingredient in the
Commonwealth, no manufacturer or contract testing facility shall use a traditional animal test
method for which a valid alternative test method exists. No provision of this subsection shall be
construed to apply to a test method conducted for the purposes of medical research.
(c) The commissioner shall promulgate regulations to implement, enforce, and administer
this section and shall establish standards for alternative test methods to ensure safety and
comparable validity of results to traditional animal test methods. The commissioner shall
of 3

consider the Organization for Economic Co-Operation and Development’s Guidelines for the
Testing of Chemicals when establishing said standards.
SECTION 2. The commissioner of public health shall promulgate regulations to
implement this act no later than 180 days following passage of this act.
SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect 6 months after the passage of this act and section
2 shall take effect upon passage.
of 3